California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) After January 1, 1978, no department or agency of the state shall undertake to acquire by ownership, rent or lease, or to otherwise occupy, in whole or in part, any property unless, after consultation with the head of that department or agency, it is determined by the director in accordance with regulations developed pursuant to subdivision (a) either (1) that the property includes a satisfactory site or sites for the location and operation of a vending facility by a blind person; or (2) that, if a building is to be constructed, substantially altered or renovated, or, in the case of a building that is already occupied on that date by the department or agency, is to be substantially altered or renovated for use by the department or agency, the design for the construction, substantial alteration or renovation includes a satisfactory site or sites for the location and operation of a vending facility by a blind person.

(g) The provisions of subdivision (f) shall not apply when the director, in consultation with the committee of blind vendors, determines that the number of people using the property is or will be insufficient to support a vending facility.

(h) For the purpose of this section, the term “satisfactory site” means an area determined by the director to have sufficient space, electrical and plumbing outlets, and any other facilities as the director shall by regulation prescribe, for the location and operation of a vending facility by a blind person.

(i) If the director determines that any agency or department of the state fails to comply with this section, the director shall establish a panel to arbitrate the dispute and the decision of the panel shall be final and binding on all parties.

(j) The arbitration panel convened by the director shall be composed of three members, appointed as follows:

(1) One individual by the director.

(2) One individual by the agency or department having care, custody or control of the premises.

(3) One individual who shall serve as chairman, jointly designated by the members appointed under paragraph (1) and paragraph (2). If either party fails to agree on an individual, the director shall designate a hearing officer from the Office of Administrative Hearings who shall preside.

(k) This section shall not apply to existing employee-operated, nonprofit organizations operating vending facilities that include manual cafeteria operations on state property.

This section shall not be construed to require that employee-operated, nonprofit organizations shall discontinue operating vending facilities that include manual cafeteria operations on state property as of January 1, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

19628.

The governing board of any county, city, city and county, or other political subdivision or the persons or entities owning or controlling private property, may construct and install on their property, or permit the construction and installation of, vending facilities for operation by blind persons licensed under this article. The amount of space allotted for this purpose shall be sufficient to serve adequately the number of persons to be served and provide the kind of services to be rendered.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

19629.

(a) The department shall provide that, if any funds are set aside, or caused to be set aside, from the net proceeds of the operation of the vending facilities those funds shall be set aside, only to the extent necessary, but not to exceed the amount equal to 6 percent of gross sales, and may be used only for the following purposes:

(1) Maintenance and replacement of equipment.

(2) The purchase of new equipment.

(3) The construction of new vending facilities.

(4) Funding the functions of the committee of blind vendors established by Section 19638.

(5) Retirement or pension funds, health insurance contributions or premiums, life insurance contributions or premiums to the extent approved by the federal Rehabilitation Services Administration, and provision for paid sick leave or vacation time or business-related insurance, if it is so determined by a majority vote of blind vendors after the department provides to each vendor full information on all matters relevant to these purposes. The department shall seek the necessary approval for expenditures of set-aside funds for life insurance contributions or premiums.

(b) No set-aside funds shall be collected where the monthly net proceeds are less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). This amount shall be annually adjusted by the department to reflect changes in the cost of living. The average of the separate indices of cost of living for Los Angeles and San Francisco, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, shall be used as the basis for determining the change in the cost of living.

(c) Set-aside funds collected from the operation of all vending facilities administered by the Business Enterprise Program shall be placed in a single fund.

(d) As used in this section, “net proceeds” shall be the sum of the amount remaining from the sale of articles or services and the amount of any vending machine or other income accruing to blind vendors after the cost of sale and other expenses (excluding set-aside charges required to be paid by the blind vendors) have been deducted.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the expenditure of the service charges authorized by this section shall be supplemental to any current appropriations available for these purposes and shall not constitute an offset or diminution of any appropriations.

(f) An amount equal to 10 percent of the wages paid by a vendor to any blind person, as defined in Section 19153, or to any disabled person, as defined in regulations issued by the department, shall be deducted from any service charge paid by the vendor, in order to encourage vendors to employ more blind and disabled workers and thereby set an example for industry and government. There shall be no deduction from any service charge paid by a vendor if the vendor does not pay wages at least equal to the minimum wages required of employers pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 329, Sec. 45.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19629.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3700 of the Labor Code, a vendor licensed by the department pursuant to this article shall operate a facility with workers’ compensation insurance provided by the Business Enterprises Program through the Business Enterprises Program group policy. The department may secure payment of compensation through a self-insurance fund or insurance against liability. This subdivision does not apply to a vending facility established pursuant to Section 395.33 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The department may further establish additional self-insurance or insurance against operational or financial risks as it determines necessary to support the
 vendors’ operations licensed by the department as provided in this article, subject to Section 11007.7 of the Government Code and paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 19629 of this code.

(c) Vendors licensed by the department as provided in this article and their employees are not employees of the state within the meaning of Section 18526 or 18529 of the Government Code or Section 2750 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 138.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19630.

(a) After July 1, 1978, all vending machine income from vending machines on state property shall accrue to (1) the blind vendor operating a vending facility on the property, or (2) in the event there is no blind vendor operating a facility on the property, to the Department of Rehabilitation Vending Machine Trust Fund for only those uses designated in subdivision (d).

(b) The department may, notwithstanding subdivision (d), distribute vending machine income accruing under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to a blind vendor of a facility not meeting the standard specified in Section 19631 on January 1, 1978, provided that the distribution was being made on January 1, 1977, and provided that the distribution shall not be in greater amount than was being made on January 1, 1977.

(c) The director shall ensure compliance with this section with respect to buildings, installations, facilities, and roadside rest stops, and shall be responsible for collection of, and accounting for, vending machine income.

Any limitation on the placement or operation of a vending machine based on a finding by a state department or agency that the placement or operation would adversely affect the interests of the state shall be fully justified in writing to the director. The director shall determine whether the limitation is justified, and if dissatisfied with the justification, may submit the matter for arbitration to the panel established by Section 19627.

(d) All vending machine income which accrues to the department shall be used to establish retirement or pension plans, to provide health and life insurance contributions, paid sick leave, vacation time, or professional services needed by the committee of licensed blind vendors, subject to a vote of blind vendors as provided under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 19629. Use of funds for provision of life insurance shall also be subject to the approval of the federal Rehabilitation Services Administration as required under paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 19629.

(e) “Vending machine income” means receipts, other than those of a blind vendor, from vending machine operations on state property, after cost of goods sold at competitive prices, including reasonable service and maintenance costs, where the machines are operated, serviced, or maintained by, or with the approval of, a department or other agency of the state, or commissions paid, other than to a blind vendor, by a commercial vending concern which operates, services, and maintains vending machines on state property.

(f) Vending machine income from vending machines on property referred to in subdivision (c) of Section 19625 shall, pursuant to agreement as there provided, accrue to (1) the blind vendor operating a vending facility on that property, or (2) in the event there is no blind vendor operating a facility on the property, to the department for the uses designated in subdivision (d) of this section. 

(g) (1) The amount of vending machine income accruing from vending machines on state property which may be used to contract for professional services, as provided in subdivision (d), shall be determined upon a vote of approval of three-fourths of the committee of licensed blind vendors. Under no circumstances shall the amount approved for professional services exceed 10 percent of the annual gross vendor machine income, as determined by the previous year’s income.

(2) The committee of licensed blind vendors may contract for the provision of professional services without the express approval of the Department of General Services.

(h) Vending machine income accruing to the department from vending machines on federal property may be used for professional services pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (g) subject to the approval of the federal Rehabilitation Services Administration. If approved, the amount approved by the committee of licensed blind vendors in any fiscal year shall not exceed the annual gross income obtained from vending machines on state and federal property. The provisions of this section shall not apply to vending machine income from vending machines operated by existing, incorporated, employee-operated, nonprofit organizations that were incorporated prior to January 1, 1977. This subdivision shall not preclude preexisting or future arrangements for these organizations to share vending machine income with blind vendors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

19630.5.

(a) The Blind Vendor Revolving Loan Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the department for the purposes specified in this section. The fund shall be interest bearing. Commencing January 1, 2008, the fund is hereby renamed the BEP Vendor Loan Interest Rate Buy-Down Fund.

(b) The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to that fund by the Legislature, and notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest, dividends, and pecuniary gains from investments or deposits of moneys in the fund.

(c) (1) Moneys in the fund shall be used by the department for the purpose of reducing the interest that vendors are required to pay for loans issued by an eligible lender to purchase inventory and equipment for vending facilities.

(2) The department shall make funding contingent upon the vendor’s good standing in the Business Enterprises Program and a determination that the department has not paid interest on another loan obtained by the vendor.

(3) Upon a determination that a vendor is eligible, the department shall pay, on behalf of the vendor, to an eligible lender, an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) to reduce the fair market interest rate of a loan described in paragraph (1) by up to 3 percent.

(4) If a vendor fails to repay a loan to an eligible lender, the lender shall reimburse the fund for the fund’s share of any interest not yet accrued as of the time of default by the vendor.

(d) In determining eligibility for loan interest buy-down assistance from this fund, the department shall make any loan interest buy-down assistance contingent upon a determination that the blind vendor reasonably can be expected to repay the loan based on the vendor’s expected income and that the applicant is currently an active vendor and has been in the Business Enterprises Program for at least one year.

(e) For purposes of this section, “eligible lender” means a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under a law of this state or in the United States to make loans or extend credit and subject to supervision by an official or agency of this state or the United States.

(f) Loan interest buy-down assistance pursuant to this section shall be made without regard to race, religion, creed, or sex.

(g) The total amount of interest buy-down assistance that may be provided under this section is limited to the amount contained in the fund, and the state shall not be liable beyond the amount contained in that fund for these debts, obligations, and liabilities.

(h) In the event that the total amount of loan interest buy-down assistance applied for under this section exceeds the total amount of assistance that may be provided pursuant to this section, the department may establish a system of priorities for the approval of applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 252.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19631.

The department shall not cause or permit the establishment or placement of any blind vendor in a vending facility unless the director, in consultation with the committee of licensed blind vendors, first determines that the facility produces, or is likely to produce within a reasonable time, an adequate net income for a blind vendor.

Nothing in this article prohibits the entity or person controlling property on which a vending facility is located from making, to the blind vendor operating it, payments in supplementation of proceeds realized from sales.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

19632.

(a) Licenses shall be issued only to applicants who are blind within the meaning of Section 19153 and who are qualified to operate vending facilities. The continuing eligibility of a vendor as a blind person shall be reviewed biennially for partially sighted individuals and whenever the department has reason to believe a vendor’s status as a blind person no longer fits the definition set forth in Section 19153.

(b) The director, in consultation with the committee of licensed blind vendors and the Program Manager of the Services for the Blind, shall adopt and publish regulations providing for all of the following:

(1) The requirements for licensure as a blind vendor.

(2) A curriculum for training and inservice training of blind vendors.

(3) A regular schedule for offering the training and inservice training classes. The classes shall be offered at least once per year, in at least two locations throughout the state.

(c) The person, governing board, or legislative body having the care, custody, and control of the building in which a vending facility is operated pursuant to this article, has the power to approve, disapprove, or withdraw approval of the person operating a vending facility, but only for good cause. Good cause shall be determined only after the person, governing board, or legislative body having control of the vending facility has notified the department in writing of the grounds for removal and has supplied any supporting material. All of the following shall apply to any disapproval or withdrawal of approval:

(1) Upon receipt of a written notification, the department shall issue a letter of reprimand to the vendor which shall include a copy of the original notification and any supporting material. The letter of reprimand shall also state the date of removal and the vendor’s right to appeal the decision of the director to remove, suspend, or terminate the vendor from participation in the Business Enterprises Program. The letter of reprimand shall be sent by certified mail with a receipt confirmation required.

(2) Upon receipt of the letter of reprimand, the vendor shall have 15 regular working days to remedy the reasons for the complaint stated in the written notification. If the condition has not been rectified to the satisfaction of the person, governing board, or legislative body having control of the vending facility, that party shall notify the director, and the vendor shall be informed by the director and shall immediately vacate the premises.

(3) The department shall make all reasonable efforts, as appropriate, to assist the vendor in rectifying the condition or reason for the complaint stated in the written notification to the department during the 15-day probation period.

(4) The department may not orally, in writing, or by any other form of communication, instigate, initiate, or encourage a person, governing board, or legislative body having the control of the property in which a vending facility is operated to request the removal of a licensee.

(d) Each license shall be issued for an indefinite period. A license may be terminated by the department for good cause but only after providing the licensee an opportunity for a full and fair hearing in accordance with the provisions of this article. The removal of a licensee upon the request of the person, governing board, or legislative body having the care, custody and control of the property in which a vending facility is operated shall not require a finding of ineligibility for licensing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

19633.

The vendor of each vending facility is subject to the provisions of any ordinance of the county or city in which the facility is located requiring a license or permit for the conduct of such business, but any such license or permit shall be issued free of charge to a blind person licensed by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

19634.

Blind persons who are authorized to operate vending facilities under this article may keep their guide dogs with them on the property while operating the vending facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

19635.

Any blind vendor who is dissatisfied with any action arising from the operation or administration of the vending facility program may submit to the department a request for a full evidentiary hearing, which shall be provided by the department. If such blind vendor is dissatisfied with any action taken or decision rendered as a result of such hearing, he may file a complaint with the Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare who shall convene a panel to arbitrate the dispute pursuant to Section 6 of the Randolph-Sheppard Act, and the decision of such panel shall be final and binding on the parties except as otherwise provided in that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

19636.

The director shall assign adequate personnel to carry out duties related to the administration of this article. In selecting personnel to fill any position under this section, the director shall comply with the discrimination prohibition of subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code. The director shall review staffing annually. The committee of licensed blind vendors shall be allowed to provide input regarding the adequacy of the staffing levels for the Business Enterprises Program prior to the director’s annual review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

19637.

The director shall provide to each blind vendor access to all relevant financial data, including quarterly and annual financial reports on the operation of the state vending facility program and access to his or her performance rating or other personal data maintained by the department in regard to him or her.

A copy of all completed audits, reports, and investigations which affect the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind shall be sent to the committee of licensed blind vendors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

19638.

(a) The director shall conduct a biennial election by secret ballot of a committee of licensed blind vendors who shall be fully representative of all blind licensees in the state program. Representation shall be no less than one committee member for every 25 licensed vendors. At the discretion of the committee, major issues may be referred to a subcommittee of blind vendors, or to all the blind vendors in order to ascertain their views. Only licensed blind persons operating a facility shall serve on the committee or subcommittees, or vote in any poll or election authorized under this article. The members and subcommittee members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses in participating in committee functions.

(b) The director shall ensure that the participation of the committee of blind vendors is, at a minimum, equal to that required by Section 107b-1 of Title 20 of the United States Code. The responsibilities and actions of the committee of blind vendors shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Participation, with the department, in major administrative decisions and policy and program development. Any implementation of changes in administrative policy or program development that is within the discretion of the department shall occur only after review by this committee of licensed blind vendors.

(2) Receiving grievances of blind vendors and serving as advocates for the vendors.

(3) Participation, with the department, in the development and administration of a transfer and promotion system for blind vendors.

(4) Participation, with the department, in developing training and retraining programs.

(5) Sponsorship, with the assistance of the department, of meetings and instructional conferences for blind vendors.

(c) The committee of licensed blind vendors may contract for professional services, including, but not limited to, legal counsel. Payment for professional services rendered to the committee of licensed blind vendors shall be made from state vending machine income pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 19630.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

19639.

(a) The director shall adopt and promulgate necessary rules and regulations, in compliance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and do all things necessary and proper to carry out this article. The director shall review these regulations for possible revision at least every three years.

(b) These regulations shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) Uniform procedures for vendor application and termination.

(2) Criteria and standards for selecting vendors and matching vendors to facilities that shall ensure that the most
 qualified person is selected for a facility.

(3) Equipment life standards and service standards for the inventory, repair, and purchase of equipment, as required under subdivision (a) of Section 19626.5.

(4) The minimum requirements for installation of a facility.

(5) A fair minimum of return to vendors.

(6) Standards for training, in-service retraining, and upward mobility.

(7) The policies and procedures used by the department for collection and deposit or disbursement of all vending facility income, including, but not limited to, the frequency, rules regarding, and method of collection of funds from facilities operated by licensed blind vendors and facilities operated by other
 individuals or entities.

(c) The director shall provide a written copy of all rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section to all vendors. Upon request by a vendor, the rules and regulations shall be supplied to the vendor as an audio recording in lieu of the written copy. In addition, the director shall notify all vendors of any proposed changes to the rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 77.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

19640.

(a) The department shall prepare and submit a report to the committee of licensed blind vendors and to any appropriate governmental agencies pursuant to Sections 20000 to 20050, inclusive, of the State Administrative Manual, on or before January 1, 1992, which shall include all of the following:

(1) A list of all state property (as defined in Section 19625 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) and federal buildings or property, which already does or which could accommodate a vending facility as provided for in this article, or the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 107 et seq.).

(2) For those buildings or locations which have a vending facility in place, an indication of which facilities are operated by licensed blind vendors as part of the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind, and which are operated by private entities.

(3) For those vending facilities operated by a private entity, an indication of those from which commissions for the Business Enterprises Program for the Blind have been collected.

(4) For those buildings or locations which do not have vending facilities in place, an indication of those in which a vending facility would appropriately be placed, or the reasons, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 19627, why a vending facility is not feasible in that building or location. 

(b) The director shall obtain all available information from the Department of General Services to conduct a survey, in every odd-numbered year on or before June 30 of each odd-numbered year commencing with 1991, for incorporation into the report required under subdivision (a). The survey shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number and identity of state buildings.

(2) The number and identity of those state buildings which have vending facilities or machines.

(3) The number of employees located in each building, rather than in the field, during working hours.

(4) The square footage of the building.

(5) Other appropriate information requested by the department.

(c) In preparing the report required by subdivision (a) and each of the updates required under subdivision (d), all departments and agencies which have vending machines or facilities shall cooperate with the department by providing information from the entities having care, custody, and control of any vending machines or facility, including, but not limited to, the terms of contracts for vending including fiscal terms, and the disbursement practices for vending machine income. The department shall incorporate this information into the report. 

(d) The report prepared by the department pursuant to this section shall be updated on or before January 1 of every even-numbered year, and this biennial update shall also be submitted to the committee of licensed blind vendors and the Legislature.

(e) The reports and updates required by this section shall be used by the department and the committee to develop greater opportunities for placement of blind vendors and vending machines and facilities on state property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

19640.5.

(a) Commencing with the 1991–92 fiscal year, the State Auditor shall conduct a fiscal audit every third fiscal year, until January 1, 2002, and a programmatic review and audit every five years, until January 1, 2003.

(b) The Joint Legislative Audit Committee may review and report on the audit requirements imposed on the State Auditor by subdivision (a) on or before January 1, 2002, for the fiscal audit requirement, and on or before January 1, 2003, for the program review and audit requirement.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 690, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19641.

The surviving spouse of a blind vendor operating a facility pursuant to this article shall have the right after the death of the blind vendor to operate the facility operated by the blind vendor immediately prior to his or her death if the spouse meets all of the following conditions:

(a) The spouse is blind as that term is defined for purposes of this article. 

(b) The spouse has been certified as qualified to operate a vending facility prior to the death of the blind vendor, even if the spouse is not currently certified as qualified to operate a vending facility.

(c) The spouse, within a period of one year after the death of the blind vendor, becomes certified as qualified to operate a vending facility by passing a certification examination with a score of at least 70 percent.

(d) The spouse has assisted the blind vendor in the operation of the vending facility.

A license shall be issued to a surviving spouse who meets the requirements in subdivisions (a) through (d). If the spouse needs to be recertified as qualified to operate a vending facility, the spouse shall have undergone at least a two-month supervised on-the-job training experience at the facility which the blind vendor operated.

A spouse seeking to operate a vending facility pursuant to this section shall be permitted to operate the facility during the one-year period after the death of the blind vendor operating the facility without regard to the status of the spouse’s certification, and the spouse shall be eligible during the one-year period after the death of the blind vendor for any training provided by the department, or any agency designated by the department, to persons seeking to become certified as qualified to operate a vending facility.

This section shall apply to vending facilities where the death of the blind vendor operating the facility occurs on or after January 1, 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Blind Vending Operators Annuity Fund [19650. - 19652.]

19650.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to further carry out the purposes of this chapter by relieving blind vending stand operators from the distress of poverty brought about by illness or old age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

19651.

From commissions collected in those facilities in which there are no blind vending stand operators licensed by the Department of Rehabilitation, the Department of Rehabilitation, upon a finding by the department that the vendors’ retirement program is actuarially sound and fiscally solvent, shall contribute to an annuity plan for blind vending stand operators licensed by the Department of Rehabilitation pursuant to Section 19630 of this chapter or pursuant to Section 107a of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

19652.

(a) The Department of Rehabilitation shall:

(1) Cooperate with or arrange through private carriers for the administration of an annuity plan pursuant to Sections 19650 and 19651.

(2) In accomplishing the provisions of this subdivision the department shall establish and consult with the committee of licensed blind vendors.

(b) The blind vending operators shall be deemed a group within the definition of Section 10200.5 of the Insurance Code who may be enrolled in a franchise or wholesale life insurance plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1316, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Appeals  [19700.1. - 19710.]

19700.1.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Appellant” means an applicant or client who has filed an oral or written request for an administrative review or a written request for a fair hearing.

(b) “Applicant” means any individual who has applied for vocational rehabilitation or independent living services which the department provides. The term also refers to individuals who apply for such services and are found ineligible.

(c) “Client” means any person receiving vocational rehabilitation or independent living services or support from the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 29.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19703.

(a) The provisions of this chapter relative to vocational rehabilitation or independent living services, or both, shall be administered fairly to the end that all persons who are eligible and apply for those services shall receive the services to which they are entitled under state and federal statutes and regulations promptly and with due consideration for their needs.

(b) Any applicant for services, or client of the department shall be informed as to the provisions of eligibility and his or her responsibility for reporting facts material to a correct determination of his or her eligibility for services.

(c) Any applicant for services, or client of the department who is denied vocational rehabilitation or independent living services, or both shall be notified in writing of the grounds on which the denial is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 937, Sec. 30.5.   Effective October 8, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

19704.

(a) If any applicant for, or client of, the department is dissatisfied with any action of the department relating to his or her application or receipt of services, or if any person who desires to apply for that assistance is refused the opportunity to submit a signed application therefor and is dissatisfied with that refusal, he or she shall, upon filing a request with the department within one year after the decision or action complained of, have a right to an administrative review and redetermination by a member or members of the supervisory staff of the department and a
 fair hearing before an impartial hearing officer.

(b) An administrative review shall not delay a hearing before an impartial hearing officer if that hearing is requested. The review shall be held and the decision of the reviewer shall be rendered to the applicant or client within 15 days of the date the request was filed.

(c) A fair hearing shall be held within 60 days of the date a written request is received by the department.

(d) Notwithstanding Sections 19130, 19131, and 19132 of the Government Code, the department shall contract with another office, entity, or department for the provision of impartial hearing officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 45.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 27, 2012, by Sec. 59 of Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

19705.

(a) (1) After consulting with the appellant, the department shall set the time and place of the hearing specified in Section 19704 before an impartial hearing officer and shall give all parties concerned written notice of the time and place of the hearing.

(2) An impartial hearing officer may change the time and place of the hearing after further consultation with, and to accommodate the convenience of, the appellant. If the appellant consents and each participant in the hearing has an opportunity to participate in the entire proceeding while it is taking place and to examine exhibits, all or part of the fair hearing may be
 conducted by means other than an in-person hearing.

(b) At the hearing, the appellant may appear, may be accompanied by a representative of his or her own choosing, or may designate a representative to appear on his or her behalf. The appellant may submit the matter on the written record and waive the right to appear at the hearing.

(c) Upon a joint request of the parties or upon a showing of good cause by either party, the impartial hearing officer may grant extensions of time or continuances of the hearing.

(d) (1) The hearing shall be conducted by an impartial hearing officer who has no personal, financial, professional, or other interest that would conflict with his or her objectivity in
 conducting the hearing. The impartial hearing officer shall be knowledgeable regarding the federal and state laws and regulations applicable to the department.

(2) The hearing shall not be conducted according to the technical rules of evidence and those related to witnesses. Any relevant evidence shall be admitted if it is the sort of evidence upon which responsible persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious affairs. Hearsay evidence may be used for the purpose of supplementing or explaining other evidence, but shall not be sufficient in itself to support a finding, unless it would be admissible over objection in a civil action. All testimony shall be under oath or affirmation, which the impartial hearing officer is empowered to administer.

(3) The
 impartial hearing officer shall do all of the following:

(A) Consider the presentation of relevant viewpoints about the issues of disagreement.

(B) Examine the evidence presented during the hearing.

(C) Issue a decision to the parties, written in ordinary and concise language and in compliance with federal and state law and regulations, that includes findings and grounds for the decision, within 30 days of the completion of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 47, Sec. 46.   (SB 1041)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Operative July 27, 2012, by Sec. 59 of Ch. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

19705.1.

Training for impartial hearing officers shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:
